pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Alimentos > Ingredientes para cozidos e assados > Massas: Massa de biscoito; Massa para pães e bolos; Massa para cookies e brownies; Massas para guioza e wonton; Masa e massa de tortilha; Massa de macarrão; Massa filo; Crostas de torta; Massa de pizza
zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 食品 > 烹饪与烘焙原料/作料 > 面团: 饼干面团; 面包/糕点面团; 饼干/布朗尼即烤面团; 饺子皮和馄饨皮; 玉米面粉和墨西哥薄饼面团; 意大利面团; 酥皮面团; 馅饼皮; 比萨面团
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Produse alimentare > Ingrediente pentru gătit și copt > Aluat: Aluat pentru biscuiți; Aluat pentru produse de panificație și patiserie; Aluat pentru fursecuri și negrese; Foi pentru găluști și wonton; Masa și aluat pentru tortilla; Aluat pentru paste; Aluat filo; Foi de plăcintă; Aluat de pizza
ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 식품 > 요리 및 제과/제빵 재료 > 반죽: 비스킷 도우; 빵/페이스트리 반죽; 쿠키/브라우니 반죽; 만두 및 완탕 피; 마사 및 토르티야 도우; 파스타 도우; 필로 도우; 파이 크러스트; 피자 도우
el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Είδη διατροφής > Υλικά μαγειρικής & ζαχαροπλαστικής > Ζύμη: Ζύμη για μπισκότα; Ζύμη ψωμιού & ζαχαροπλαστικής; Ζύμη για μπισκότα & μπράουνις; Φύλλα για ντάμπλινγκ και ουόντον; Ζύμη για μάσα και τορτίγιες; Ζύμη για ζυμαρικά; Φύλλο κρούστας; Ζύμες για τάρτες; Ζύμη για πίτσα
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Matvarer > Ingredienser til matlagning og baking > Deig: Kjeksdeig; Brød- og bakerdeig; Cookie- og browniedeig; Deig til dumpling og wonton; Masa- og tortilladeig; Pastadeig; Filodeig; Paiskorper; Pizzadeig
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Artigos alimentares > Ingredientes para cozinhar e assar > Massa: Massa para biscoitos; Massa para pão e pastelaria; Massa para bolachas e brownies; Massa para dumplings e wontons; Massa para tortilhas; Massa fresca; Massa filo; Massas de tarte; Massa de pizza
th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > รายการอาหาร > ส่วนผสมในการทำอาหารและการอบ > แป้งผสม: แป้งบิสกิต; แป้งผสมสำหรับขนมปังและขนมอบ; แป้งผสมสำหรับคุกกี้และบราวนี่; แป้งเกี๊ยวซ่าและแป้งเกี๊ยว; แป้งมาซ่าและแป้งตอร์ติญา; แป้งพาสต้า; แป้งฟิลโล; เปลือกพาย; แป้งพิซซ่า
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Prehrambeni izdelki > Sestavine za kuhanje in peko > Testo: Testo za piškote; Testo za kruh in pecivo; Testo za piškote in brownije; Zavitki za cmoke in wonton; Testo masa in testo za tortilje; Testo za testenine; Vlečeno testo; Testo za pito; Testo za pico
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Alimentos > Ingredientes de cocina y repostería > Masa: Masa para panecillos; Masa para pan y pasteles; Masa para brownies y galletas; Masa para dumplings y wontons; Masa para tortillas; Masa para pasta; Masa filo; Masas para tarta; Masa para pizza
bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Хранителни продукти > Съставки за готвене и печене > Тесто: Тесто за бисквити; Тесто за хляб и сладкиши; Тесто за бисквити и брауни; Обвивки за кнедли и уонтон; Тесто за маса и тортила; Тесто за паста; Кори за баница; Кори за пай; Тесто за пица
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Ruokatuotteet > Ruuanlaitto- ja leivonta-aineet > Taikina: Keksitaikinat; Leipä- ja leivonnaistaikina; Keksi- ja brownie-taikina; Dumpling- ja wonton-kuoret; Masa- ja tortillataikinat; Pastataikinat; Filotaikinat; Piirakkapohjat; Pizzataikinat
it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Alimenti > Ingredienti per cucinare e da forno > Impasto: Impasto per biscotti; Impasto per pane e paste; Pasta per biscotti e brownie; Sfoglie per ravioli e wonton; Masa e impasto per tortillas; Impasto per pasta; Pasta fillo; Coperture e basi di pasta per torte; Impasto per pizza
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Voedselitems > Ingrediënten voor koken en bakken > Deeg: Koekjesdeeg; Brood- en taartdeeg; Koekjesdeeg en browniebeslag; Dumpling- en wontonvellen; Masa- en tortilladeeg; Pastadeeg; Filodeeg; Korstdeeg; Pizzadeeg
hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Prehrambeni artikli > Sastojci za kuhanje i pečenje kolača > Tijesto: Tijesto za kekse; Tijesto za kruh i peciva; Tijesto za kekse i kolače; Omoti za knedle i wonton; Tijesto za masu i tortilje; Tijesto za tjesteninu; Filo tijesto; Kore za pitu; Tijesto za pizzu
sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Livsmedel > Ingredienser för matlagning och bakning > Deg: Kexdeg; Bröd- och bakelsedeg; Kak- och browniedeg; Degknyten & wontonplattor; Masa- & tortilladeg; Pastadeg; Filodeg; Pajskal; Pizzadeg
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Lebensmittel > Koch- & Backzutaten > Teig: Biskuitteig; Brot- & Gebäckteig; Plätzchen- & Brownieteig; Dumpling- & Wan-Tan-Teig; Masa- & Tortilla-Teig; Nudelteig; Filoteig; Pastetenteig; Pizzateig
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Potraviny > Prísady na varenie a pečenie > Cesto: Cesto na sušienky; Cesto na chlieb a pečivo; Cesto na sušienky a brownie; Cesto na knedličky a wontony; Masa a tortillové cesto; Cesto na cestoviny; Tenké lístkové cesto filo; Krehké cesto na koláč; Cesto na pizzu
ja: 食品・飲料 > 食品 > 調理材料・製菓材料 > パン生地・製菓用生地: ビスケット生地; パン生地・ピザ生地; クッキー生地・ブラウニー生地; 餃子・ワンタンの皮; マサ・トルティーヤ生地; パスタ生地; フィロ生地; パイ生地; ピザ生地
zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 食品 > 烹飪和烘焙食材 > 生麵團: 比司吉麵團; 麵包/糕點生麵團; 餅乾/布朗尼生麵團; 水餃皮與餛飩皮; 玉米粉與墨西哥薄餅麵團; 義大利麵麵團; 酥皮麵團; 派皮; 披薩麵團
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Пищевые продукты > Кулинарные и кондитерские ингредиенты > Тесто: Тесто для печенья; Тесто для хлеба и выпечки; Тесто для печенья и брауни; Тесто для пельменей и вонтонов; Маса и тесто для тортилий; Тесто для пасты; Тесто фило; Тесто для пирогов; Тесто для пиццы
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Żywność > Składniki do gotowania i pieczenia > Surowe ciasta: Ciasto na ciastka; Surowe ciasto na chleb i słodkie wypieki; Surowe ciasta na ciastka i brownies; Ciasto na pierogi i wontony; Ciasto na tortille i masa; Ciasto na makaron; Ciasto filo; Spody z kruchego ciasta; Ciasto na pizzę
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Fødevarer > Ingredienser til madlavning og bagning > Dej: Kiksedej; Dej til brød og kager; Dej til cookies og brownies; Dej til dumplings og wontons; Masa- og tortilladej; Pastadej; Filodej; Tærtedej; Pizzadej
fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Aliments > Ingrédients pour la cuisine et la pâtisserie > Pâte: Pâte à biscuits; Pâte à pain et à pâtisserie; Pâte à biscuits et pâte à brownies; Pâtes à raviolis et à wonton; Masa et pâte à tortilla; Pâte à pâtes; Pâte filo; Pâtes à tarte; Pâte à pizza
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Yiyecek Çeşitleri > Pişirme Malzemeleri > Hamur: Bisküvi hamuru; Ekmek ve Pasta Hamuru; Kurabiye ve Brownie Hamuru; Mantı ve wonton yufkaları; Masa ve tortilla hamuru; Makarna hamuru; Yufka; Pasta Kabukları; Pizza hamuru
cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Potraviny > Ingredience na vaření a pečení > Těsto: Těsto na sušenky; Těsto na chleba a pečivo; Těsto na cookies a brownies; Těsto na knedlíčky a wontony; Masa a těsto na tortilly; Těsto na těstoviny; Filo těsto; Korpusy na koláče; Těsto na pizzu
vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Hàng thực phẩm > Nguyên liệu nấu ăn và nướng bánh > Bột nhào: Bột bánh quy; Bột nhào làm bánh mỳ và bánh ngọt; Bột nhào làm bánh quy và bánh sô cô la hạnh nhân; Vỏ sủi cảo & hoành thánh; Bột masa & bánh tortilla; Bột mì Ý; Bột bánh phyllo; Vỏ bánh nướng; Đế bánh pizza
hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Élelmiszertételek > Főzési és sütési összetevők > Tészta: Keksz- és piskótatészták; Kenyér- és péksütemény-tészta; Süti- és brownie-tészta; Gombóc- és wonton tészták; Masa és tortillatészták; Gyúrt tészták; Filotészták; Pitetészták; Pizzatészták
en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Food Items > Cooking & Baking Ingredients > Dough: Biscuit Dough; Bread & Pastry Dough; Cookie & Brownie Dough; Dumpling & Wonton Wrappers; Masa & Tortilla Dough; Pasta Dough; Phyllo Dough; Pie Crusts; Pizza Dough
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Maisto prekės > Maisto gaminimo ir kepimo ingredientai > Tešla: Sausainių tešla; Duonos ir pyrago tešla; Sausainių ir šokoladainių tešla; Koldūnų ir wontonų lakštai; Masa ir tortilijų tešla; Makaronų tešla; Filo tešla; Pyragų plutos; Picos tešla